Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 3. Commissioners

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

20 Am. Jur. 2d Courts § 4.

21 C.J.S. Courts §§ 228 to 235.

§ 5-3-301.
Appointment; number.

District courts of the
several judicial districts of this state are empowered to appoint
such number of district court commissioners in the several counties
of their respective judicial districts as the public interest may
require.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 115, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3329; C.S. 1910, § 917; C.S. 1920, § 1143; R.S. 1931, § 31-211; C.S. 1945, § 1-610; W.S. 1957, § 5-65.

Cross references. —

As to authority of legislature to provide for the appointment of court commissioners, see art. 5, § 14, Wyo. Const.

As to conveyance of real property by master commissioner in connection with enforcement of judgment lien by execution, see §§

1-17-322

and

1-17-323

.

As to authority of court commissioner to grant injunctions, in the absence from the county of the district judge, see §

1-28-103

.

As to powers and duties of court commissioners in vacation, with reference to probate court, see §§

2-2-106

through

2-2-108

.

As to authority of judge or commissioner to order payment of fees to clerk in probate matters and as to liability of clerk on his bond for collection thereof, see §§

2-2-401

and

2-2-402

.

As to duty of commissioners relative to the enforcement of §§

35-10-201

through

35-10-207

, relating to fireworks, see §

35-10-206

.

Applied

in

Sandstrom v. Sandstrom, 880 P.2d 103,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

Huhn v. Quinn, 21 Wyo. 51, 128 P. 514,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1912).

§ 5-3-302.
Term of office; summary removal.

District court commissioners
shall hold office during the pleasure of the district court, and may
be summarily removed.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 115, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 3330; C.S. 1910, § 918; C.S. 1920, § 1144; R.S. 1931, § 31-212; C.S. 1945, § 1-611; W.S. 1957, § 5-66.

Cited

in

Huhn v. Quinn, 21 Wyo. 51, 128 P. 514,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1912).

§ 5-3-303.
Qualifications.

District court commissioners
shall be learned in the law in this state, residents of the district
for which appointed, and citizens of this state. To be learned in
the law a person shall have sufficient knowledge, skill, training
or experience to perform judicial functions.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 115, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 3331; C.S. 1910, § 919; C.S. 1920, § 1145; R.S. 1931, § 31-213; C.S. 1945, § 1-612; W.S. 1957, § 5-67; Laws 1991, ch. 49, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to qualifications of commissioners prescribed by constitution, see art. 5, § 14, Wyo. Const.

Cited

in

Huhn v. Quinn, 21 Wyo. 51, 128 P. 514,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1912).

§ 5-3-304.
Order of appointment to be made in open court and entered on journal;
use as evidence.

The order appointing
each district court commissioner shall be made in open court and entered
upon the journal. A certified copy of such journal entry shall be
evidence of such appointment in all the courts of this state.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 115, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 3332; C.S. 1910, § 920; C.S. 1920, § 1146; R.S. 1931, § 31-214; C.S. 1945, § 1-613; W.S. 1957, § 5-68.

Quoted

in

May v. May, 945 P.2d 1189,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1997).

Cited

in

Huhn v. Quinn, 21 Wyo. 51, 128 P. 514,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1912).

§ 5-3-305.
Appointment
and termination thereof to be reported to county clerk.

When any court or the
judge thereof, shall appoint a court commissioner who shall be authorized
to take acknowledgments and administer oaths under this act, or whenever
any court or the judge thereof shall revoke the appointment of any
such court commissioner, or when any such commissioner shall resign,
or his appointment cease for any reason, it shall be the duty of the
clerk of said court to immediately notify, in writing, the county
clerk of each county embraced within the jurisdiction of said court,
of the making of said appointment or the termination thereof, as the
case may be.

History.

Laws 1884, ch. 29, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 10; R.S. 1899, § 2748; C.S. 1910, § 3640; C.S. 1920, § 4596; R.S. 1931, § 97-121; C.S. 1945, § 3-2804; W.S. 1957, § 5-69; 2009, ch. 168, § 206.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths generally, see §

1-2-102

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “and ex officio register of deeds” following “the county clerk.”

§ 5-3-306.
Oath.

District court commissioners
before entering upon the discharge of their official duties, shall
take and subscribe before the clerk of the district court, of the
county for which they were respectively appointed, the oath of office
provided by the constitution.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 115, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 3333; C.S. 1910, § 921; C.S. 1920, § 1147; R.S. 1931, § 31-215; C.S. 1945, § 1-614; W.S. 1957, § 5-70.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional oath of office, see art. 6, §§ 20 and 21, Wyo. Const.

Cited

in

Huhn v. Quinn, 21 Wyo. 51, 128 P. 514,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1912).

§ 5-3-307.
Powers generally.

Each district court commissioner shall have the powers in respect to every suit or proceeding pending in the district court of the county for which he was appointed, as follows:

If no judge qualified to hear or act in the proceeding or action is present in the county for which such commissioner was appointed, to make any order which a judge of the district court is authorized by law to make in chambers and to hear and determine cases of mental illness or mental incompetency, and to hold juvenile detention or shelter care hearings;

To make any order which a judge of the district court is authorized by law to make in chambers, upon the written statement of such judge, filed with the papers, that he is disqualified in such case;

To administer oaths;

To hear, try and determine all issues whenever an application shall have been made for a change of judge;

To take evidence and make findings, and report the same to the district court;

To take depositions;

To punish persons for contempts committed during hearings had before him;

To issue and enforce process for the attendance of witnesses and production of evidence in all lawful hearings before him, in the same manner and with like force as the court might do if in session.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 115, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 3334; C.S. 1910, § 922; C.S. 1920, § 1148; Laws 1929, ch. 151, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 31-216; C.S. 1945, § 1-615; W.S. 1957, § 5-71; Laws 1969, ch. 180, § 1; 1975, ch. 151, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1993, ch. 210, § 2.

Cross references. —

For constitutional powers of commissioners, see art. 5, § 14, Wyo. Const.

As to officers authorized to administer oaths generally, see §

1-2-102

.

As to authority to issue injunctions when judge is absent from county, see §

1-28-103

.

As to power to solemnize marriage, see §

20-1-106

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Judgment by commissioner on merits is invalid. —

A court commissioner is without authority to determine on the merits the issues in an action where the judge has been disqualified; the expression “chamber business” in art. 5, § 14, Wyo. Const., refers to such business or proceedings as might be conducted by the judge at chambers, and not to the trial on the merits, and his judgment in such case is invalid for want of jurisdiction. Huhn v. Quinn, 21 Wyo. 51, 128 P. 514,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1912).

Extending time for filing record. —

District court commissioner had authority to extend time for filing record on appeal, since, under former direct appeal statute, the power was one which the district judge might exercise in chambers. Miller v. New York Oil Co., 32 Wyo. 483, 235 P. 323,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1925).

Child support modification proceeding. —

Pursuant to Wyo. Const., art. 5, § 14, and this section, an assignment to a court commissioner to take evidence and make findings in a child support modification proceeding is not improper, but the district court must be apprised of the evidence received and relied upon by the court commissioner in making his findings, and the district court must independently review the evidence and findings in making its decision, with such review being indicated on the record. Foster v. Foster, 768 P.2d 1038,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1989), reh'g denied,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. Mar. 2, 1989).

Authority in custody modification cases. —

District court commissioner had authority to take evidence and make findings in a custody modification case. May v. May, 945 P.2d 1189,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1997).

District court afforded unwarranted deference to determinations by court commissioner

and expanded the role of the court commissioner beyond that envisioned by constitution and statute, where no part of the proceedings before the court commissioner was transcribed for review by the district court and the court's order modifying a divorce decree contained only the conclusions of the court commissioner. Gaines v. Doby, 773 P.2d 442,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1989).

Authority to rule on the admissibility of evidence. —

Paragraph (a)(v) does not confer upon a district court commissioner authority to exclude evidence or make legal rulings on the admissibility of evidence, and commissioner exceeded his authority when he ruled on a motion in limine and refused to accept party's evidence at hearing. May v. May, 945 P.2d 1189,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1997).

Quoted

in

Sandstrom v. Sandstrom, 880 P.2d 103,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

Mau v. Stoner, 12 Wyo. 478, 76 P. 584,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1904); Weltner v. Thurmond, 17 Wyo. 310, 98 P. 601,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1908).

§ 5-3-308.
Fees.

The fees of the district
court commissioners shall be fixed by the district courts in which
their services are rendered and may be taxed as costs, paid from the
budget of the district court or from other funds available for that
purpose.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 115, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 3335; C.S. 1910, § 923; C.S. 1920, § 1149; R.S. 1931, § 31-217; C.S. 1945, § 1-616; W.S. 1957, § 5-72; Laws 1991, ch. 49, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to costs in district courts in general, see §

5-3-206

.

As to duty of legislature to provide by law the fees which may be demanded by court commissioners, see art. 14, § 2, Wyo. Const.

As to fees of court commissioner in probate matters, see §

2-2-404

.

Court fixes fees. —

District court commissioner is without jurisdiction to fix his fees; statute requires district court to do it. Brown v. Brown, 23 Wyo. 1, 146 P. 231,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1915).

Standards for court's determination. —

The fees of a court commissioner appointed to take testimony and report findings of fact and law are not necessarily to be determined in accordance with judicial salaries paid in the state, but are to be fixed in accordance with the character of the services, the amount involved and the ability and standing of the commissioner. Weltner v. Thurmond, 17 Wyo. 310, 98 P. 601,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1908), reh'g denied, 17 Wyo. 310, 99 P. 1128,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1909).

A fee of $500.00 was held not excessive,

considering the time and amount involved. Weltner v. Thurmond, 17 Wyo. 310, 98 P. 601,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1908), reh'g denied, 17 Wyo. 310, 99 P. 1128,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1909).

§ 5-3-309.
Orders to be entered in court journal.

All orders made by, and
proceedings had before district court commissioners, shall be entered
at length in the journal of the district court of the county for which
they were appointed, by the district clerk, and shall be signed by
the commissioners.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 115, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 3336; C.S. 1910, § 924; C.S. 1920, § 1150; R.S. 1931, § 31-218; C.S. 1945, § 1-617; W.S. 1957, § 5-73.

Cross references. —

As to records to be kept by clerk of court, see §

5-3-202

.

§ 5-3-310.
District court to review orders; approval or disapproval.

The district court shall
at each term review all orders made by, and proceedings had before
commissioners of such court during vacation, and approve, disapprove,
reverse or modify every such order or proceeding.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 115, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 3337; C.S. 1910, § 925; C.S. 1920, § 1151; R.S. 1931, § 31-219; C.S. 1945, § 1-618; W.S. 1957, § 5-74.

Order not submitted for approval. —

Prior loans held not included in an order by a district court commissioner limiting the amount that a surviving partner could borrow which was not submitted to the judge for approval. State Bank v. Bagley Bros., 44 Wyo. 244, 11 P.2d 572,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 44 Wyo. 456, 13 P.2d 564,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1932).

Contempt proceedings. —

A court commissioner found a party guilty of contempt, and imposed a fine upon him. Thereafter the matter was heard by the court under this section. The act of the court was not in the exercise of a general jurisdiction which it might have to punish for contempt, but was in the nature of a review, and the fact that the court went further in its order than merely to approve the acts of the commissioner, and adjudged the accused guilty of contempt, and prescribed the penalty, did not change the nature of the proceedings, where the order was confessedly based on the commissioner's findings. Mau v. Stoner, 12 Wyo. 478, 76 P. 584,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1904), reh'g denied, 14 Wyo. 183, 83 P. 218 (Wyo. 1905).

Quoted

in

Foster v. Foster, 768 P.2d 1038,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1989).

§ 5-3-311.
Office of commissioner and clerk declared incompatible.

The office of district
court commissioner and clerk of the district court are hereby declared
to be incompatible and no person shall occupy the office of district
court commissioner who is at the same time a clerk of the district
court, or is a county clerk in counties wherein such clerk is ex officio
clerk of court.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 53, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3338; C.S. 1910, § 926; C.S. 1920, § 1152; R.S. 1931, § 31-220; C.S. 1945, § 1-619; W.S. 1957, § 5-75.

Cited

in

Huhn v. Quinn, 21 Wyo. 51, 128 P. 514,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1912).

Law reviews. —

For note, “The Common-Law Rule Against Holding Incompatible Offices — Abolishing the ‘Office’ Limitation,” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 667 (1974).

§ 5-3-312.
Commissioner not to act as attorney; when attorney not to act as
commissioner.

No district court commissioner
shall accept employment or retainer as an attorney-at-law, or give
any advice as such in any action, cause or proceeding pending before
him as such commissioner; and he shall not be authorized to act as
such commissioner, or exercise any of the powers thereof, in any action,
case or proceeding in which or as to the subject thereof he shall
have been engaged, employed or retained as an attorney, or in reference
to which and the subject thereof he shall have given any advice.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 53, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 3339; C.S. 1910, § 927; C.S. 1920, § 1153; R.S. 1931, § 31-221; C.S. 1945, § 1-620; W.S. 1957, § 5-76.

Practice of law. —

Part-time circuit court magistrate, who would have been a county court commissioner under former legislation that defined the position in exactly the same manner as the revised legislation, was precluded from practicing law only under the precise circumstances enumerated by the statute, and thus could serve as an attorney in an adoption proceeding. MTM v. LD (In re KJD), 2002 WY 26, 41 P.3d 522,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2002).

Insufficient evidence of disqualification. —

An allegation of the disqualification of a court commissioner to act, on the ground of previous employment as counsel in a former action between the parties, supported only by the record in such action which disclosed nothing showing that the commissioner had been engaged as counsel or gave advice in reference to the proceedings pending before him, held not to show disqualification. State ex rel. Mau v. Ausherman, 11 Wyo. 410, 72 P. 200,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 11 Wyo. 410, 73 P. 548,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1903).